Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201660-469
Gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR), defined.

Gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR) means the value specified by the manufacturer as the loaded weight of a single vehicle.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 19;

Laws 2016, LB311, § 4.
March 4, 2016